Washington statutes.
RCW 36.29.022

Combining of moneys for investment.

Upon the request of one or several units of local government or authorized tribal officials of tribes that invest their money with the county under the provisions of RCW 36.29.020, the treasurer of that county may combine those units' and/or tribes' moneys for the purposes of investment.

[ 2023 c 74 s 2; 1986 c 294 s 11.]